en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.aff
FLAG long
SFX ED Y 25
SFX ED 0 d [^e]e 
SFX ED e d ee 
SFX ED 0 bed [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX ED 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX ED 0 ded [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX ED 0 fed [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX ED 0 ged [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX ED 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX ED 0 led [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ED 0 ed [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ED 0 led [^aeo]al 
SFX ED 0 ed [aeo]al 
SFX ED 0 med [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX ED 0 ned [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX ED 0 ped [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX ED 0 red [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX ED 0 sed [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX ED 0 ted [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX ED 0 ved [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX ED 0 zed [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX ED y ied [^aeiou]y 
SFX ED 0 ed [aeiou]y 
SFX ED 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX ED 0 ed [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX ED 0 ed [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX Ed Y 16
SFX Ed 0 d e 
SFX Ed 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Ed 0 led [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Ed y ied [^aeiou]y 
SFX Ed 0 ed [aeiou]y 
SFX Ed 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Ed 0 ed [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Ed 0 ed [^ecly] 
SFX Ed e ing [^eioy]e 
SFX Ed 0 ing [eoy]e 
SFX Ed ie ying ie 
SFX Ed 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Ed 0 ling [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Ed 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Ed 0 ing [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Ed 0 ing [^ecl] 
SFX Eh Y 22
SFX Eh 0 dly e 
SFX Eh 0 bedly [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX Eh 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Eh 0 dedly [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX Eh 0 fedly [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX Eh 0 gedly [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX Eh 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX Eh 0 ledly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Eh 0 medly [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX Eh 0 nedly [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX Eh 0 pedly [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX Eh 0 redly [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX Eh 0 sedly [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX Eh 0 tedly [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX Eh 0 vedly [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX Eh 0 zedly [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX Eh 0 edly [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX Eh y iedly [^aeiou]y 
SFX Eh 0 edly [aeiou]y 
SFX Eh 0 edly [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Eh 0 edly [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Eh 0 edly [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX Ei Y 22
SFX Ei 0 dness e 
SFX Ei 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX Ei 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Ei 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX Ei 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX Ei 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX Ei 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX Ei 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Ei 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX Ei 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX Ei 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX Ei 0 redness [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX Ei 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX Ei 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX Ei 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX Ei 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX Ei 0 edness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX Ei y iedness [^aeiou]y 
SFX Ei 0 edness [aeiou]y 
SFX Ei 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Ei 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Ei 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX ET Y 42
SFX ET 0 r e 
SFX ET 0 st e
SFX ET 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX ET 0 best [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX ET 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX ET 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX ET 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX ET 0 dest [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX ET 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX ET 0 fest [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX ET 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX ET 0 gest [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX ET 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX ET 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX ET 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX ET 0 lest [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX ET 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX ET 0 mest [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX ET 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX ET 0 nest [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX ET 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX ET 0 pest [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX ET 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX ET 0 rest [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX ET 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX ET 0 sest [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX ET 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX ET 0 test [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX ET 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX ET 0 vest [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX ET 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX ET 0 zest [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX ET y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX ET y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX ET 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX ET 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX ET 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX ET 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX ET 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX ET 0 est [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX ET 0 est [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX ET 0 est [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX ER Y 72
SFX ER 0 r e 
SFX ER 0 rs e 
SFX ER 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX ER 0 bers [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX ER 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX ER 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX ER 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX ER 0 ders [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX ER 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX ER 0 fers [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX ER 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX ER 0 gers [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX ER 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX ER 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX ER 0 ler [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ER 0 er [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ER 0 ler [^aeo]al 
SFX ER 0 er [aeo]al 
SFX ER 0 lers [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ER 0 ers [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ER 0 lers [^aeo]al 
SFX ER 0 ers [aeo]al 
SFX ER 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX ER 0 mers [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX ER 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX ER 0 ners [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX ER 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX ER 0 pers [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX ER 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX ER 0 rers [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX ER 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX ER 0 sers [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX ER 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX ER 0 ters [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX ER 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX ER 0 vers [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX ER 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX ER 0 zers [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX ER y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX ER y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX ER 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX ER 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX ER 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX ER 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX ER 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX ER 0 ers [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX ER 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX ER 0 ers [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX ER 0 r's e 
SFX ER 0 ber's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX ER 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX ER 0 der's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX ER 0 fer's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX ER 0 ger's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX ER 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX ER 0 ler's [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ER 0 er's [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX ER 0 ler's [^aeo]al 
SFX ER 0 er's [aeo]al 
SFX ER 0 mer's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX ER 0 ner's [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX ER 0 per's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX ER 0 rer's [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX ER 0 ser's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX ER 0 ter's [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX ER 0 ver's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX ER 0 zer's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX ER y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX ER 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX ER 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX ER 0 er's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX ER 0 er's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX Er Y 24
SFX Er 0 r e 
SFX Er 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Er 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Er y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX Er 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX Er 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Er 0 er [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Er 0 er [^ecly] 
SFX Er 0 rs e 
SFX Er 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Er 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Er y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX Er 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX Er 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Er 0 ers [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Er 0 ers [^ecly] 
SFX Er 0 r's e 
SFX Er 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Er 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Er y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX Er 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX Er 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Er 0 er's [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Er 0 er's [^ecly] 
SFX ES Y 9
SFX ES y ies [^aeiou]y 
SFX ES 0 s [aeiou]y 
SFX ES 0 es [sxz] 
SFX ES 0 es [cs]h 
SFX ES 0 s [^cs]h 
SFX ES 0 s [ae]u 
SFX ES 0 x [ae]u 
SFX ES 0 s [^ae]u 
SFX ES 0 s [^hsuxyz]
SFX EP Y 6
SFX EP y iness [^aeiou]y 
SFX EP 0 ness [aeiou]y 
SFX EP 0 ness [^y] 
SFX EP y iness's [^aeiou]y 
SFX EP 0 ness's [aeiou]y 
SFX EP 0 ness's [^y] 
SFX Em Y 20
SFX Em 0 sman [bdknmt] 
SFX Em 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 man [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 man [^bdeknmt] 
SFX Em 0 smen [bdknmt] 
SFX Em 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 men [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 men [^bdeknmt] 
SFX Em 0 sman's [bdknmt] 
SFX Em 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 man's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX Em 0 smen's [bdknmt] 
SFX Em 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX Em 0 men's [^bdeknmt] 
