en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.dic
adventitious/EPEY
advise/EBELERESEGEDElEh
affect/EhEVEvENEnEkEDEiESEG
agitate/EDEVEGESENEnEh
alert/EPEhESEDERETEYEG
allege/ENESEhEnEDEG
alloy/ESEGEMED
alms/Em
anaesthetize/ENEREDESEGEn
apart/EPEL
arsine/EMES
artillery/E3EmESEM
asses/EGED
attain/ElEDEREBEGELES
awaken/EdEJES
aware/EP
backhand/EhEREMESEGED
baggage/EmESEM
baggy/ETEPES
barb/ESEREGEMEDEi
barque/EMES
base/EmEYEPEpELEMET
bast/EDEREGEM
beaver/EdESEM
belate/EDEiEh
benefit/ErEMEdES
binding/EPEM
bitter/EYEPESEd
blandish/EDEGELES
blast/EGERESEMED
bless/EhEGESEDEiEJ
bloke/EMES
blowzy/ET
bluster/ErESEZEdEk
bogey/EGEmEMEDES
borrow/EREGESE7EJED
bosom/EUEdES
breech/ESEGEMED
broody/ETEP
buffer/ErEd
buffet/ESEdEJEM
bullhead/EhEMEDESEi
bumble/EDEREkESEG
bumpkin/EMES
business/EmE5ES
busy/EPESEYETEGED
calculate/EiEVEDESEGEkEBEhENEn
can/EdEzE2ESEDEREZErEGEyEM
cape/EBEDEREMElES
cap/ESEAEDEG
cater/EdErES
caustic/ESEY
cave/EmERESEMEDEG
celebrate/EiEnENESEDEyEG
censor/EdESEM
chatter/EdESEr
cheat/EREDESEG
cheerful/ETEP
chivvy/ESEGED
chorus/EMEdES
church/EmEMEGE5ESEDEY
clean/EBEDERETEPEYEGES
clumsy/ETEYEP
coffer/ESEdEM
cologne/ESEMED
comfy/ET
committee/EmESEME5
conceit/EGEiEMESEDEh
concern/EhEUED
confuse/EkEREhEi
conjure/ENEREGESEnED
consequentiality/ESEM
content/ELEEEDEhEGEMES
co-operate/EVESEDEGEuENEv
costly/ETEP
country/E5EmEMES
covet/EdESEk
crab/E2EGEhEDEREzEMEiEZES
cricket/ErEdEMES
crinkly/ETES
crossbow/EmESEM
crumb/EYEDEZESEMEG
crummy/ET
curs/EGEyEiEhESED
dagger/EdEMES
dampen/EdErES
daub/EDEREGES
debauch/EyEGEhESEiED
decisive/EPEIEY
delta/ESEM
demit/EDENESEG
deprave/EDEhESEiEG
determine/EuEDEREBEvEGEVEhEiES
devote/EiExEh
diadem/ESEMEd
dingy/ETESEP
disappoint/ELEhEk
disinterest/Ei
dispassionate/EP
disperse/ELEXEVEuEbENEvEDEhEREGES
dissipate/EnEVERENEDESEhEiEG
document/ENEMEREDEGESEn
dog/EDESEMEiEGEZEh
dollar/ESEM
door/EDEmEGEMES
dot/EME2EZEdEDEkErEGES
ducky/ETESEM
echo/EAEGED
elite/ESE3EM
elusive/EP
engross/ELEDESEGEhEk
enslave/EREGELESED
entangle/EEEDELESEG
envelop/ELErEdES
excite/ElEkEnEGENELEREDESEBEh
excursiveness/ES
expect/EnESEhEGEDEiE7EkEN
expos/ErEdES
fastidious/EYEP
fatten/EdErES
ferry/ESEGEmEWEDEM
fey/ET
filter/E7ESErEnEdEMEN
fir/ErEdES
flatten/ESErEd
flatter/ESEdEkEZEr
flay/EDEREGES
fledge/EDESEG
foggy/ETEPEY
foot/EGESEREDEJEhEiEpEM
foppish/EPEY
foresight/ESEMEiEDEh
free/EmETESEYEPEdEG
frenzy/EDEMESEhEG
fritter/EdES
frontiers/Em
fusty/ETEP
gallop/ESErEd
gauzy/ETEP
geyser/EdEMES
glide/EGESEREDEJ
glue/ESEREMEDEGEZ
goldbrick/EMEDERESEG
gouty/ET
groundless/EPEY
hammer/EdEpEr
hammy/ET
hand/EhE6EREzEZESEiEpEMEGEDE2
hang/E7EREmEDEJESEG
harp/EREMEDEGE3EZEJES
heighten/ESEd
highway/EmEMES
homely/ETEP
horn/EDEGEiEpE2EZESEM
hothead/ESEDEiEhEM
house-mother/ESEM
hulk/EGEMEDES
hunky/ET
hunt/EDEmEGEREJES
hypothesis/EdE8ErEME9EQES
idle/EDERETEPESEG
impulsive/EP
instructive/EP
interconnect/EGEDEiES
intoxicate/EGEDEhEnENES
joist/ESEMED
journey/EREmESEMEDEJEG
junta/EMES
kill/ESEREkEJE7EGED
kingly/ETEP
kinky/ETEP
labour/EJESEhEREiEkEGEDEM
ladder/Ed
lag/ESErEDEJEG
laundry/E5ESEmEM
limit/ErEnEdEpEMESEgEl
lively/ETEP
livery/EDEmEMES
London/ErEM
lonesome/EPESEY
Luxembourg/EREM
mammogram/ES
mandamus/ESEdEM
maraud/ESEREDEG
market/EgE7ErESEMEdEJ
measure/ELESEpEMEhElEGED
mere/ETEYES
meticulous/EPEY
militia/EmESEM
mop/EdESEGErEMED
mug/E2EJEMEREGEZESED
mutilate/EGEnESENED
natty/EPEYET
newsworthy/ETEP
noble/EmEPETE5ES
not/E7ENExEdEgEnElES
nullify/EDERESEnENEG
offhand/EiEDEh
paltry/ETEP
pandemonium/EMES
pardon/ErEgElE7EdES
peerless/EPEY
pervert/EDEhESEiEG
photograph/ERE1EGEZEDEWESEM
pip/EdErEDEkEMEGES
pitch/EREGEDES
podgy/ETEP
point/EREhESEpEGEiEMEDEZ
poison/EdEMErES
ponytail/ESEM
powerless/EPEY
punt/EREGEDEMES
quantify/E7ENEREDEGEnES
quarry/EmESEMEGED
queasy/EPEYET
racket/EMEdEZES
rapturous/EPEY
redhead/ES
re/EnExEhEoEYEJENEi
repeat/EBEREDEGEh
restrain/EGEh
right-hand/EiED
rocky/ET
romance/ERESEDEMEG
roughen/EdES
scatter/ErESEkEJEd
scrappy/ET
scratch/EDE2EzEJEZERESEG
servitor/ESEM
show/EGEJEmERE2EzESEDEZ
shrubby/ET
side-swipe/EDEMEGES
sinful/EP
sir/EdEMES
sleigh/ESEREMEDEG
soupy/ET
sprocket/EdESEM
square/EPEMETEDESEYEG
stagger/ESEkErEd
stall/ESEGEIED
stamp/EREJEDEGES
steppingstone/ES
stilt/EMEhEiESED
strong/EmETEY
sturdy/ETEYEP
synthesis/ErEQE9ESE8EdEM
syphon/Ed
tasty/ETEPEY
teleconference/EGEMEDES
telegraph/EWEZEDE1EGESEME3ER
timepiece/ESEM
tun/EWE7ErEdESEZ
twee/ET
tweet/ESEREGED
unsettle/EkEi
valve/ESEDEMEp
voyeurism/ESEM
warehouse/EDEmEMEGES
win/EREGEdESEJ
worry/EREDEkESEGEh
writ/EMErES
